District of Columbia statutes.
42-3107

Security.

No security bond shall be required to issue a preliminary injunction or temporary restraining order sought by the United States Attorney for the District of Columbia or by the Corporation Counsel. Otherwise, the court may require a security bond to issue a preliminary injunction or temporary restraining order.

Mar. 26, 1999, D.C. Law 12-194, § 8, 45 DCR 7982
1981 Ed., § 45-3307.
See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 42-3101.
For temporary addition of chapter, see notes to § 42-3101.